Colorado statutes. Title 38. Property - Real and Personal
Part 1. Foreclosure Sale
38-38-110.
Sales by officer - location - announcement - records - electronic devices - definitions.

Notwithstanding the provisions of any deed of trust or other lien being foreclosed, the officer shall conduct the sale at any door or entrance to, or in any room in any building temporarily or permanently used as, a courthouse or at or within any building where the office of the county clerk and recorder or the office of the officer is located, which place shall be specifically designated in the combined notice; except that a sale may be conducted by means of the internet or other electronic medium. The county, the officer, and employees of the county or the officer, acting in their official capacities in preparing, conducting, and executing a sale under this article by means of the internet or another electronic medium, are not liable for the failure of a device that prevents a person from participating in a sale under this article.

As used in this paragraph (a), “device” includes any computer hardware, computer network, computer software application, or website.

The combined notice shall designate the actual place of sale or, if the sale is conducted by means of the internet or another electronic medium, the information prescribed by section 38-38-103 (4)(a)(VII).

At a sale, the officer shall read only the public trustee’s sale number for a sale by the public trustee or the court case number for a sale by the sheriff, the name of the original grantor, the street address or, if none, the legal description of the property, the name of the holder of the evidence of debt, the date of sale, the first and last publication dates of the combined notice, and, in accordance with section 38-38-106 (4), the amount of the bid and the name of the person that submitted the bid. In lieu of reading the information listed above, the officer may post the information at the location of the sale, provide a written copy of the information to all persons present at the sale, or post the information on the internet or other electronic medium if the sale is conducted by means of the internet or another electronic medium.

Whenever a public trustee sells property described in a deed of trust, the public trustee shall enter in the records of the office of the public trustee the name of the person executing the deed of trust, the book and page or reception number of the recorded deed of trust, a brief description of the property therein described, the date of sale, the publisher of the combined notice, a list of the names and addresses of the persons to whom the combined notice was mailed, the name and last mailing address of the purchaser at the sale, and the amount at which the property was sold in separate parcels, if so sold, or en masse.

History.

Source:
L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1662, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2006:

Entire section amended, p. 1463, § 16, effective January 1, 2008.

L. 2007:

(2) amended, p. 1838, § 13, effective January 1, 2008.

L. 2015:

(1) and (2) amended,(HB 15-1142), ch. 113, p. 341, § 5, effective September 1.

Editor’s note:

(1) This section is similar to former § 38-37-108, as it existed prior to 1990.

(2) The effective date for amendments made to this section by chapter 305, Session

L

aws of Colorado 2006, was changed from July 1, 2007, to January 1, 2008, by section 27 of chapter 404, Session

L

aws of Colorado 2007. (See L. 2007, p. 1849.)

38-38-111.
Treatment of an overbid - agreements to assist in recovery of overbid prohibited - penalty - definition.

An overbid shall be first applied to any deficiency as indicated in the holder’s bid, and then paid to the officer to be held in escrow until the end of all redemption periods as provided in section 38-38-302.

Upon the expiration of all redemption periods provided in section 38-38-302, any remaining overbid shall be paid in order of recording priority to junior lienors, determined as of the recording date of the notice of election and demand or lis pendens according to the records, who have duly filed a notice of intent to redeem and whose liens have not been redeemed pursuant to section 38-38-302, in each case up to the unpaid amount of each such lienor’s lien plus fees and costs. A lienor holding a lien that is not entitled to redeem by virtue of being recorded after the notice of election and demand, a lienor that has not timely filed a notice of intent to redeem pursuant to section 38-38-302, or a lienor who accepts less than a full redemption pursuant to section 38-38-302 (4)(c) shall not have any claim to any portion of the overbid. After payment to all lienors and the holder entitled to receive a portion of the overbid pursuant to this section, any remaining overbid shall be paid to the borrower.

(2.5)

If a public trustee maintains a website for his or her office, the public trustee shall include the following statement on such website:

NOTICE TO A BORROWER IN FORECLOSURE:

If your property goes to foreclosure auction sale and is purchased for more than the total owed to the lender and to all other lien holders, please contact the public trustee’s office after the sale because you may have funds due to you.

In order to pay the borrower of the property as required pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, a public trustee shall send a notice to the borrower. If the amount of remaining overbid is equal to or greater than twenty-five dollars, the public trustee shall make reasonable efforts to identify the borrower’s current address. The public trustee shall mail the borrower a notice regarding the remaining overbid to the best available address no later than thirty days after the expiration of all redemption periods as provided in section 38-38-302.

[Editor’s note: This version of subsection (2.5)(c) is effective until March 1, 2022.] An agreement to pay compensation to recover or assist in recovering an amount due to the borrower from the public trustee under subsection (2) of this section is not enforceable. A person who induces or attempts to induce another person to enter into such an agreement commits a misdemeanor, as defined in section 18-1.3-504, and is subject to imprisonment in county jail for up to six months, a fine of up to ten thousand dollars, or both.

(c)

[

Editor’s note: This version of subsection (2.5)(c) is effective March 1, 2022.

]

An agreement to pay compensation to recover or assist in recovering an amount due to the borrower from the public trustee under subsection (2) of this section is not enforceable. A person who induces or attempts to induce another person to enter into such an agreement commits a class 2 misdemeanor.

When the property is sold by the sheriff, all of the sale proceeds must be deposited into the registry of the court.

When the property is sold by the public trustee, any unclaimed remaining overbid from a foreclosure sale shall be held by the public trustee in escrow. The remaining overbid shall be held for six months from the date of the sale. The public trustee is answerable for the funds without interest at any time within the six-month period to any person legally entitled to the funds. Any interest earned on the escrowed funds must be paid to the county at least annually. Unclaimed remaining overbids that are less than twenty-five dollars and that are not claimed within six months from the date of sale must be paid to the general fund of the county, and such money paid to the general fund of the county becomes the property of the county. Unclaimed remaining overbids that are equal to or greater than twenty-five dollars and that are not claimed within six months from the date of the sale are unclaimed property for purposes of the “Revised Uniform Unclaimed Property Act”, article 13 of this title 38, and must be transferred to the administrator in accordance with article 13. After the unclaimed remaining overbids are transferred to the administrator or to the general fund of the county, the public trustee is discharged from any further liability or responsibility for the money.

If the unclaimed remaining overbids exceed five hundred dollars and have not been claimed by any person entitled thereto within sixty calendar days after the expiration of all redemption periods as provided by section 38-38-302, the public trustee shall, within ninety calendar days after the expiration of all redemption periods, commence publication of a notice for four weeks, which means publication once each week for five successive weeks, in a newspaper of general circulation in the county where the subject property is located. The notice must contain the name of the borrower, the borrower’s address as given in the recorded instrument evidencing the borrower’s interest, and the legal description and street address, if any, of the property sold at the sale and must state that an overbid was realized from the sale and that, unless the funds are claimed by the borrower or other person entitled thereto within six months after the date of sale, the funds shall be transferred to the state treasurer for disposition in accordance with the “Revised Uniform Unclaimed Property Act”, article 13 of this title 38. The public trustee shall also mail a copy of the notice to the borrower at the best available address.

The fees and costs of publication and mailing required pursuant to this subsection (3) must be paid from the money escrowed by the public trustee.

A lienor who accepts a redemption amount less than the full amount of a lien or a holder of an evidence of debt who accepts a redemption amount less than the amount bid at a sale prior to the expiration of all applicable redemption periods under this article shall not be entitled to receive a portion of any excess proceeds pursuant to this section.

Repealed.

As used in this section, “borrower” means a person or entity liable under an evidence of debt constituting a mortgage loan or deed of trust.

History.

Source:
L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1662, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 1341, § 11, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(2) amended, p. 1207, § 85, effective August 4.

L. 2006:

Entire section amended, p. 1464, § 17, effective January 1, 2008.

L. 2007:

(2) amended and (4) added, p. 1838, § 14, effective January 1, 2008.

L. 2009:

(1) and (2) amended,(HB 09-1207), ch. 164, p. 716, § 12, effective September 1.

L. 2012:

(1), (2), and (3) amended and (2.5) and (5) added,(SB 12-030), ch. 96, p. 322, § 10, effective September 1.

L. 2016:

(2.5)(c) added and (3)(a) and (3)(b) amended,(HB 16-1090), ch. 97, p. 277, § 4, effective August 10.

L. 2018:

(3) amended,(HB 18-1254), ch. 138, p. 909, § 6, effective August 8.

L. 2019:

(3)(a) and (3)(b) amended,(SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 469, § 15, effective July 1, 2020.

L. 2021:

(2), (2.5), and (3)(b) amended, (5) repealed, and (6) added,(HB 21-1224), ch. 199, p. 1057, § 2, effective May 28; (2.5)(c) amended,(SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3293, § 686, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor’s note:

(1) This section is similar to former § 38-37-113, as it existed prior to 1990.

(2) The effective date for amendments made to this section by chapter 305, Session

L

aws of Colorado 2006, was changed from July 1, 2007, to January 1, 2008, by section 27 of chapter 404, Session

L

aws of Colorado 2007. (See L. 2007, p. 1849.)

(3) Amendments to subsection (2.5)(c) by HB 21-1224 and SB 21-271 were harmonized, effective March 1, 2022.

(4) Section 803(2) of chapter 462 (SB 21-271), Session Laws of Colorado 2021, provides that the act changing this section applies to offenses committed on or after March 1, 2022.

38-38-112.
Use of electronic documents authorized.

Repealed.

Consistent with the “Uniform Electronic Transactions Act”, article 71.3 of title 24, C.R.S., any document or record related to a foreclosure may be accepted by the officer in an electronic format or may be made available to the public by the officer in an electronic format. The officer shall establish and uniformly apply written policies for determining whether and the extent to which the officer shall accept documents or records in electronic form; except that the officer shall not require the use of an electronic format for any purpose under this article except as necessary for sales conducted by means of the internet or another electronic medium.

History.

Source:
L. 2005:

Entire section added, p. 399, § 6, effective August 8.

L. 2006:

Entire section amended, p. 1465, § 18, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(1)(a) and (2)(a) amended, p. 1839, § 15, effective June 1.

L. 2015:

(2) amended,(HB 15-1142), ch. 113, p. 342, § 6, effective September 1.

Editor’s note:

(1) Subsection (1)(b) provided for the repeal of subsection (1), effective July 1, 2007. (See

L

. 2006, p. 1465.)

(2) For amendments to subsection (1)(a) by House Bill 07-1157 in effect from June 1, 2007, to July 1, 2007, see

L

. 2007, p. 1839.

38-38-113.
Rescission of public trustee sale.

If the successful bidder at a foreclosure sale is the holder of the evidence of debt foreclosing the deed of trust or other lien, then such successful bidder, the bidder’s attorney, the assignee of the successful bidder pursuant to section 38-38-403, or the assignee’s attorney may rescind the sale without obtaining a court order by filing with the public trustee no later than eight business days after the date of the sale a notice of rescission of sale stating that the sale is being rescinded, the number and date of the sale, the name of the person to whom the certificate of purchase was issued, the name of the assignee, if any, the recording date and reception number or book and page number for the recorded certificate of purchase, and the legal description of the property foreclosed. The notice shall be signed and properly acknowledged by the successful bidder or assignee, or signed by the bidder or assignee’s attorney. Upon receipt of the notice of rescission of sale, any assignment of the certificate of purchase, the public trustee’s fee for the rescission specified in section 38-37-104, and the costs of recording the notice of rescission of the sale, the public trustee shall record the notice of rescission of sale in the county records.

Upon recording of the notice of rescission of sale by the public trustee, the certificate of purchase shall be deemed canceled as if the sale had not occurred, and the evidence of debt and deed of trust shall be deemed fully reinstated with the same lien priority as if the sale had not occurred. The public trustee shall confirm the reinstatement by indorsement on the evidence of debt and deed of trust or copy thereof submitted pursuant to section 38-38-101.

Within ten calendar days after receipt of all documents and fees and costs specified in subsection (1) of this section, the public trustee shall mail a copy of the notice of rescission of sale to each person who was entitled to receive the combined notice pursuant to section 38-38-103.

After the recording of the notice of rescission of sale, the holder of the evidence of debt or the holder’s assignee, or the attorney for the holder or the assignee, may notify the public trustee in writing to reschedule the sale. The public trustee shall set a new date of sale at least thirty calendar days but not more than forty-five calendar days after the date on which the public trustee receives notice to schedule a new date of sale, subject to the requirements of section 38-38-109 (2).

No later than ten calendar days after receiving notice to schedule a new date of sale, the public trustee shall mail a combined notice setting forth the rescheduled date of sale to each person who was entitled to receive the combined notice pursuant to section 38-38-103.

No later than twenty calendar days after receiving notice to schedule a new date of sale, but no less than ten calendar days prior to the new date of sale, the public trustee shall publish the sale one time only.

All fees and costs of the public trustee for actions performed under this section and the cost of recording the notice of rescission of sale shall be part of the foreclosure costs.

After a sale has been rescinded and rescheduled pursuant to this subsection (4), the sale may be continued in accordance with section 38-38-109 (1)(a).

If a written request to reschedule the sale is not received by the public trustee within one year of the recording of the notice of rescission, the foreclosure must be withdrawn according to section 38-38-109 (3)(b).

Nothing in this section shall prevent any person from seeking a rescission of a sale through a court of competent jurisdiction.

Claims for damages by any person arising out of a rescission of a sale pursuant to this section shall be limited to the reasonable actual expenses of the person and shall not include any speculative or expectation damages, awards, or claims of any kind, whether legal or equitable.

The indorsement of the public trustee pursuant to subsection (2) of this section shall be in substantially the following form:

[Form Excluded]

State of Colorado.

History.

Source:
L. 2007:

Entire section added, p. 1839, § 16, effective January 1, 2008.

L. 2009:

(1) amended, (HB 09-1207), ch. 164, p. 717, § 13, effective September 1.

L. 2018:

(3) amended and (4)(f) added, (HB 18-1254), ch. 138, p. 910, § 7, effective August 8.

38-38-114.
Unclaimed refunds - disposition under “Revised Uniform Unclaimed Property Act”.

Money payable as a refund for overpayment of a cure of default pursuant to section 38-38-104 or for overpayment of a redemption pursuant to part 3 of this article 38 that remains unclaimed by the owner one year after the money became payable is presumed abandoned and shall be reported and paid to the state treasurer in accordance with sections 38-13-401 and 38-13-603.

History.

Source:
L. 2007:

Entire section added, p. 1839, § 16, effective January 1, 2008.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended, (SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 470, § 17, effective July 1, 2020.